Idaho, session 2025, H0433.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 7-1603, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
7-1603. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Assisted reproduction" means the laboratory and medical proce-
dures used by a medical professional in which human gametes are used outside
the body for reproductive purposes.
(2) "Compensation" means a payment of money, objects, services, or any-
thing else having monetary value. Compensation shall not include reimburse-
ment for actual expenses, as provided for in section 18-1511, Idaho Code, to
the gestational carrier or payment for goods or services incurred by the in-
tended parents as a result of the pregnancy and that would not have been in-
curred but for the pregnancy.
(2) (3) "Gamete" means a mature male or female germ cell usually pos-
sessing a haploid chromosome set and capable of initiating formation of a new
diploid individual by fusion with a gamete of the opposite sex.
(3) (4) "Genetic testing" means an analysis of genetic markers to ex-
clude or identify a person as the parent of a child, including an analysis of
one (1) or a combination of the following:
(a) Deoxyribonucleic acid; and
(b) Blood group antigens, red cell antigens, human leukocyte antigens,
serum enzymes, serum proteins, or red cell enzymes.


(4) (5) "Gestational agreement" means a contract under which a gesta-
tional carrier agrees to become pregnant by means of assisted reproduction
in order to give birth to a child who will be parented by an intended parent.
(5) (6) "Gestational carrier" means an adult woman who:
(a) Becomes pregnant or intends to become pregnant under the terms of a
gestational agreement; or
(b) Gives birth or intends to give birth to a child under the terms of a
gestational agreement.
(6) "Intended parent" means an individual who intends to be the parent
of a child born under the terms of a gestational agreement.
(a) There may be one (1) intended parent or two (2) intended parents un-
der a gestational agreement.
(b) Except where context otherwise requires, any provision of this
chapter relating to an intended parent shall relate to both intended
parents if there are two (2).
(7) "Intended parents" means two (2) individuals who are married to
each other in accordance with Idaho law who each contribute gametes and who
enter into an enforceable gestational agreement with a gestational carrier
pursuant to which they will be the legal parents of the child resulting from
that assisted reproduction.
(7) (8) "Order of parentage" means an order issued by a court or ad-
ministrative body with authority to issue the order, which order identifies
the legal parent or parents of a child born under the terms of a gestational
agreement.
SECTION 2. That Section 7-1604, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
7-1604. GESTATIONAL AGREEMENT. (1) Prior to assisted reproduction, a
gestational carrier and an intended parent the intended parents shall en-
ter into a written gestational agreement. If the gestational carrier is mar-
ried, her spouse shall also be a party to the agreement. Neither the gesta-
tional carrier nor her spouse may contribute gametes for use in assisted re-
production under the gestational agreement.
(2) The gestational agreement shall provide that the intended parents
will be the parents of any child conceived through assisted reproduction and
born under the terms of the agreement.
(3) The gestational agreement shall include the following:
(a) Acceptance by the intended parent of all rights and duties of a par-
ent for any child conceived through assisted reproduction and born un-
der the terms of the gestational agreement; An agreement between the in-
tended parents and the gestational carrier that:
(i) The gestational carrier has sole authority with respect to
medical decision-making during the term of the pregnancy consis-
tent with the rights of a pregnant woman carrying her own biologi-
cal child;
(ii) The intended parents agree to accept custody of and assume
full parental rights and responsibilities for the child immedi-
ately upon the child's birth, regardless of any impairment of the
child; and


(iii) The intended parents will be recognized as the legal parents
of the child;
(b) Verification that:
(i) All parties to the agreement are at least twenty-one (21)
years of age;
(ii) The gestational carrier is at least twenty-five (25) years of
age but no more than thirty-five (35) years of age;
(iii) The gestational carrier has undergone a physical and mental
health evaluation to ensure that she does not have underlying risk
factors that would increase the danger of pregnancy to herself or
the child;
(ii) (iv) The gestational carrier has given birth to a live child
at least once before; and
(v) The gestational carrier has, prior to executing the gesta-
tional agreement, undergone at least two (2) counseling sessions,
separated by at least thirty (30) days, with a licensed clinical
social worker, licensed psychologist, licensed psychiatrist, or
licensed counselor to discuss the proposed gestational agreement;
(iii) (vi) The gestational carrier agrees to become pregnant by
means of assisted reproduction, using the gametes of the intended
parents, and to give birth to the resulting child; and
(vii) The gestational carrier agrees to reasonable medical eval-
uation and treatment during the term of the pregnancy, to adhere
to reasonable medical instructions about prenatal health, and to
execute medical records releases pertaining to the planned preg-
nancy in favor of the intended parents; and
(c) Relinquishment by the prospective gestational carrier, the
prospective gestational carrier's spouse if she is married, and the
prospective donor of a gamete for use in assisted reproduction, if such
prospective donor is not an intended parent, of all rights and duties of
a parent for any child conceived through assisted reproduction and born
under the terms of the agreement.
(4) A prospective gestational carrier may not be receiving public as-
sistance as defined by section 56-201, Idaho Code.
(5) A gestational agreement may not provide for payment of considera-
tion but may provide for payment of expenses as set forth in section 7-1604A,
Idaho Code.
(6) A gestational agreement shall not limit the right of the gesta-
tional carrier to make decisions to safeguard her health or that of an embryo
or a fetus that she is carrying.
(7) In matters relating to the gestational agreement, the gestational
carrier and the intended parents shall have independent legal representa-
tion.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 16, Title 7, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 7-1604A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
7-1604A. PAYMENT OF COMPENSATION PROHIBITED -- EXPENSES ALLOWED. The
gestational carrier will receive no compensation other than:


(1) Actual medical expenses, including hospital, testing, nursing,
midwifery, pharmaceutical, or other similar expenses incurred by the ges-
tational carrier for prenatal care and those medical and hospital expenses
incurred incident to the birth;
(2) Actual expenses incurred for mental health counseling services
provided to the gestational carrier prior to the birth and up to six (6)
months after birth;
(3) Actual lost wages of the gestational carrier not covered under a
disability insurance policy when bed rest has been prescribed for the ges-
tational carrier for some maternal or fetal complication of pregnancy and
the gestational carrier, who is employed, is unable to work during the pre-
scribed period of bed rest;
(4) Actual court costs and attorney's fees incurred by the gestational
carrier; and
(5) Payment of any judicially sanctioned settlement or judgment ren-
dered in favor of the gestational carrier or her heirs as a result of her
death, loss of reproductive organs or capability, or any other health com-
plication caused by the in utero embryo transfer, pregnancy, or resulting
childbirth, miscarriage, or termination of pregnancy.
SECTION 4. That Section 7-1605, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
7-1605. VALIDATION OF AGREEMENT. (1) A gestational agreement entered
into under this chapter is enforceable only if it is validated pursuant to
this section.
(2) For a gestational agreement to be validated pursuant to this sec-
tion, at least one (1) each party to the agreement must reside in Idaho and
have so resided for at least six (6) months prior to entering into the gesta-
tional agreement or have contacts with the state of Idaho sufficient to jus-
tify jurisdiction in the opinion of an Idaho district court.
(3) The parties seeking validation of a gestational agreement shall
file a petition in an Idaho district court.
(a) The petition shall be filed after entry of the agreement but no
later than seven (7) days after the birth of a child under the terms of
the agreement.
(b) The gestational agreement shall be attached to the petition.
(c) An independent board-certified physician in obstetrics and gyne-
cology or in reproductive endocrinology who has medically treated the
intended mother over a period of time such that the physician is compe-
tent to reach medical conclusions about the intended mother's medical
condition and shall submit a signed affidavit certifying that in utero
embryo transfer with a gestational carrier is medically necessary to
assist in reproduction. For purposes of this paragraph, "medically
necessary" means that the intended mother has been diagnosed to be in-
fertile or to have a physical condition such that a pregnancy would
create serious risk of death or substantial and irreversible impairment
of a major bodily function beyond the risk customary to pregnancy and
child birth. The affidavit shall be filed with the petition.
(4) Upon the filing of the petition and associated documents required
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the court shall:


(a) Order and be entitled to the criminal history record and identifi-
cation files of the Idaho state police bureau of criminal identifica-
tion on each of the intended parents and the gestational carrier and her
spouse, if she is married, as a means of performing background checks
on those individuals. The bureau shall, upon request and after receipt
of fingerprint cards and other identifying information from the court,
make available to the court information contained in the bureau's crim-
inal history record and identification files that pertains to each of
the intended parents and the gestational carrier and her spouse, if she
is married. In addition, in order to determine an applicant's suitabil-
ity, the fingerprint cards shall be forwarded by the Idaho state police
to the federal bureau of investigation for a national criminal history
record check. The required fees for the criminal history record checks
shall be borne by the parties to the agreement;
(b) Order that the department of health and welfare conduct a records
check for validated complaints of child abuse or neglect in this or any
other state in which either of the intended parents and the gestational
carrier and her spouse, if she is married, has been domiciled since
adulthood; and
(c) Order that the court administrator's office of the supreme court
conduct a records check for protective orders issued by any Idaho court
involving each of the intended parents and the gestational carrier and
her spouse, if she is married.
(5) Each order required pursuant to subsection (4) of this section
shall state the full name, date of birth, social security number, and former
and current state of domicile since adulthood for each subject of the check.
The sheriff or the Idaho state police bureau of criminal identification, the
department of health and welfare, and the court administrator's office of
the supreme court shall accord priority to these orders and shall provide a
certificate to the district court indicating all information discovered or
that no information has been found.
(4) (6) The district court may hold a hearing to determine the valid-
ity of the agreement. The district court shall issue an order validating the
agreement and declaring that the intended parent is parents are or will be
the parents of any child born under the terms of the agreement upon finding
that:
(a) The gestational agreement satisfies the provisions of this chap-
ter;
(b) The requirements of this section have been satisfied and the re-
ports of criminal records, validated complaints of child abuse or ne-
glect, and protective order records show that there is no risk of harm to
the child or the gestational carrier;
(b) (c) The parties have voluntarily entered into the agreement and un-
derstand its terms; and
(c) (d) Adequate provision has been made for all reasonable health
care applicable expenses associated with the gestational agreement
set forth in section 7-1604A, Idaho Code, including responsibility for
those expenses if the agreement is terminated; and.
(d) The consideration provided for in the agreement, if any, is reason-
able.


SECTION 5. That Section 7-1606, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
7-1606. TERMINATION OF AGREEMENT -- EFFECTS OF DIVORCE, ANNULMENT,
AND MARRIAGE. (1) A party to a gestational agreement may terminate the agree-
ment at any time prior to the gestational carrier becoming pregnant by means
of assisted reproduction under the terms of the agreement. The terminating
party must give written notice of termination to the other parties.
(a) If the agreement has been validated pursuant to section 7-1605,
Idaho Code, the terminating party shall file notice of termination with
the district court, and the court shall vacate the order of validation.
(b) Failure to provide the notice required by paragraph (a) of this sub-
section shall be considered contempt of the authority of the court pur-
suant to chapter 6, title 7, Idaho Code.
(2) The district court for good cause shown may terminate a gestational
agreement.
(3) Neither a gestational carrier nor a gestational carrier's spouse
shall be liable to any intended parent for terminating a gestational agree-
ment.
(4) A court order granting the divorce or annulment of a marriage be-
tween the intended parents, if entered before the in utero embryo transfer,
terminates the gestational agreement. Upon the filing of a motion notifying
the court of the court order granting divorce or annulment, the court shall
issue an order vacating the order of validation.
(5) After the issuance of an order validating the gestational agree-
ment, any subsequent marriage of the gestational carrier does not affect the
validity of a gestational agreement. The consent of the spouse is not re-
quired, and he is not a presumed father of the resulting child, notwithstand-
ing any legal presumption to the contrary.
SECTION 6. That Section 7-1607, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
7-1607. PARENTAGE UNDER A VALIDATED GESTATIONAL AGREEMENT. (1) This
section shall apply in determining the parentage of a child born under the
terms of a gestational agreement that has been validated pursuant to section
7-1605, Idaho Code.
(2) No later than fourteen (14) days after the birth of the child, the
intended parents shall file notice of the birth with the district court that
issued the validation order. The court shall then issue an order of parent-
age confirming that the intended parent is the parent parents are the parents
of the child and directing the state registrar of vital statistics to file a
birth certificate naming the intended parents as the parents of the child.
If necessary, the court shall further order that the child be surrendered to
the intended parents. The order of parentage shall contain the following in-
formation:
(a) The child's full name;
(b) The child's date of birth;
(c) The child's place of birth;
(d) The gestational carrier's full name;


(e) The full name of the gestational carrier's spouse, if the gesta-
tional carrier is married; and
(f) The full name of each intended parent.
(3) If the intended parent fails parents fail to file notice as required
under pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the gestational carrier
or the department of health and welfare may file such notice, and the court
shall order that the intended parent is the parent parents are the parents of
the child and financially responsible for the child.
(4) Failure to file notice required by this section shall be considered
contempt of the authority of the court pursuant to chapter 6, title 7, Idaho
Code.
SECTION 7. That Chapter 16, Title 7, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 7-1613, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
7-1613. GESTATIONAL CARRIER DATA COLLECTION. (1) The purpose of this
section shall be the compilation of relevant maternal life and health fac-
tors and data concerning gestational carriers to the extent that it is autho-
rized by law.
(2) The state registrar of vital statistics shall prescribe forms for
the collection of information and statistics with respect to enforceable
gestational agreements. Such forms shall include but not be limited to the
following information:
(a) The age, marital status, and state and county of domicile of the
gestational carrier;
(b) The county in which the in utero embryo transfer took place;
(c) The full name and address of the physician or physicians performing
or attending to the following phases of the gestational carrier:
(i) In utero embryo transfer;
(ii) Prenatal and postnatal care;
(iii) Birth;
(iv) Miscarriage; and
(v) Induced abortion;
(d) The length and weight of the child born to the gestational carrier;
(e) The age, marital status, and state and county of domicile of the in-
tended parents;
(f) The medical reason necessitating the gestational carrier;
(g) The medical procedures employed in the birth, miscarriage, or ter-
mination of pregnancy for medical emergency;
(h) The length and weight of an unborn child miscarried by the gesta-
tional carrier;
(i) Other significant conditions or health complications of the unborn
child and gestational carrier; and
(j) The results of pathological examinations of any unborn child who
died as a result of pregnancy complications or pregnancy termination of
a gestational carrier.
(3) The physician performing the in utero embryo transfer or termina-
tion of the pregnancy by birth, miscarriage, or abortion shall provide the
information required by the provisions of this section.


(4) Such completed forms shall be transmitted by the physician to the
vital records registry within fifteen (15) days of the performance of the
medical procedures.
(5) The department of health and welfare shall promulgate by rule, sub-
ject to legislative approval, the penalty for the failure to complete the
forms required pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(6) The vital statistics records required by this section and the
identities of the parties to a gestational agreement shall be confidential
and shall not be subject to disclosure, release, or inspection except upon
application to a competent court and in conformity with the applicable re-
quirements of confidentiality applicable to adoptions. The reporting of the
data for public health purposes shall redact any identifying information as
provided in section 74-106, Idaho Code.
SECTION 8. That Section 39-255A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-255A. REGISTRATION OF BIRTHS TO GESTATIONAL CARRIERS. (1) Subject
to the requirements set forth in section 39-255, Idaho Code, a certificate
of live birth shall be filed with the bureau of vital records and health sta-
tistics by the certifier with parentage as determined by the final court or-
der of parentage issued pursuant to the provisions of chapter 16, title 7,
Idaho Code. The birth record shall include all the facts of birth, includ-
ing the gestational carrier's demographic, medical, and health information.
No certificate shall be deemed complete until every item of information re-
quired has been provided or its omission satisfactorily accounted for.
(2) Upon receipt by the bureau of the complete certificate of live birth
from the certifier and the certified copy of the order of parentage, the bu-
reau of vital records and health statistics shall accept the record for per-
manent filing. The birth certificate shall make no reference to the ges-
tational carrier. The facts of birth as relating to the gestational car-
rier set forth in section 7-1613, Idaho Code, shall be filed with and remain
part of the records of the bureau of vital records and health statistics in a
sealed file with a certified copy of the order of parentage.
(3) In the absence of an order of parentage, the birth certificate shall
be filed listing the gestational carrier as the mother of the child. The ges-
tational carrier's information may not be removed, and an intended parent's
information may not be listed on the birth certificate except:
(a) According to the provisions of section 39-255(e), Idaho Code, to
add a biological father; or
(b) Upon receipt of a certified copy of an order of parentage and a cer-
tified report of gestational birth. The report form will be prescribed
and furnished by the state registrar. Copies of birth certificates
showing the gestational carrier as the mother of the child shall not be
issued except upon order of an Idaho court.
(4) Information necessary to prepare the report of gestational birth
shall be furnished by the attending physician and the intended parent or
parents or the attorney for the intended parent or parents. The order of
parentage and the report of gestational birth shall contain all known facts
of birth and the identity of the intended parent or parents.


(5) Upon receipt by the bureau of the certified report of gestational
birth and the certified order of parentage, a new certificate of birth shall
be established bearing the full name of the child born and the identity of
the intended parent or parents. The new birth certificate shall make no ref-
erence to the gestational carrier and shall not be marked as amended. The
new birth certificate shall supplant and constitute replacement of any birth
certificate for the child previously filed with the bureau of vital records
and health statistics and shall be the only birth certificate subject to is-
suance. The certified report of gestational birth and certified order of
parentage shall be filed with and remain part of the records of the bureau of
vital records and health statistics in a sealed file with the original cer-
tificate.
(6) In respect to form and nature of contents, the new birth certificate
shall be identical to the birth certificate originally filed with the bureau
of vital records and health statistics, except that the intended parent or
parents shall be entered on the certificate as shown in the report of gesta-
tional birth. The child's name shall remain as shown on the original birth
certificate unless the order of parentage specifically states how the bureau
of vital records and health statistics should list the child's name on the
birth certificate.
(7) An order of parentage may be amended only to correct a clerical er-
ror.
(8) All records and information specified in this section, other than a
birth certificate issued pursuant to this section, and all records, files,
and information of any court in this state relating to gestational birth and
parentage proceedings shall not be open to inspection except on order of a
court of record of this state; provided, however, that any Idaho magistrate
judge may furnish a certified copy of an order of parentage to any duly autho-
rized agency of the United States or the state of Idaho without procuring any
prior court order.
SECTION 9. That Section 39-260A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-260A. REGISTRATION OF STILLBIRTHS TO A GESTATIONAL CARRIER. If a
stillbirth occurs and the stillborn child was delivered under the terms of a
gestational agreement entered and validated pursuant to chapter 16, title 7,
Idaho Code, then a certificate of stillbirth shall be filed with the bureau
of vital records and health statistics according to the provisions of sec-
tion 39-260(4) and (5), Idaho Code. The certificate shall show the name of
the gestational carrier and shall note her status as a gestational carrier.
No certificate shall be deemed completed until every item of information re-
quired pursuant to section 7-1613, Idaho Code, has been provided or its omis-
sion satisfactorily accounted for.
SECTION 10. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.